Missouri, session 2026, HB1848.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 227, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 227.900, to read as follows:
227.900. The bridge on CST Dougherty Ferry Road crossing over Interstate 270
2 in St. Louis County shall be designated the "Army SSG Salvatore Palazzolo Memorial
3 Bridge". The department of transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs
4 designating such bridge, with the costs to be paid by the department of transportation.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.